Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-34] Tobacco and electronic
smoking devices use prohibited. (a) Notwithstanding the less restrictive
requirements of chapter 328J, the Hawaii health systems corporation shall
prohibit the use of any tobacco product or electronic smoking device by any
person on the premises of all facilities operated by the corporation within the
State, to the extent not prohibited by federal law and regulation.

(b) Pursuant to section 89-9(d), the tobacco
and electronic smoking device use prohibitions under this section shall not be
subject to collective bargaining.

(c) The corporation shall prominently display
signs stating that "tobacco and electronic smoking device use is
prohibited" at all entrances to the corporation's health facilities and at
other conspicuous locations throughout the outdoor premises of each health
facility.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to aerosolize and deliver nicotine or other
substances to the person inhaling from the device, including, but not limited
to, an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic
pipe, hookah pipe, or hookah pen, and any cartridge or other component of the
device or related product, whether or not sold separately.

"Premises" means all indoor and
outdoor areas within the state-designated property boundary lines of each of
the corporation's health facilities and shall include all employee and visitor
parking lots.

"Tobacco or electronic smoking device
use" does not include mere possession or storage of the same for use in
locations outside the premises of the corporation's health facilities.

"Tobacco product" means any product
made or derived from tobacco that contains nicotine or other substances, and is
intended for human consumption or is likely to be consumed, whether smoked,
heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested by any other means,
including, but not limited to, a cigarette, cigar, pipe tobacco, chewing
tobacco, snuff, snus, or an electronic smoking device. "Tobacco
product" does not include drugs, devices, or combination products approved
for sale by the United States Food and Drug Administration, as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act. [L 2016, c 25, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next